dictionaries/uk/index.aff
SFX d Y 160
SFX d ей 'ї ей
SFX d ей 'їв ей
SFX d ей 'ям ей
SFX d ей 'ями ей
SFX d ей 'ях ей
SFX d іль лі [^л]іль
SFX d інь ні [^л]інь
SFX d іть ті [^л]іть
SFX d іць ці [^л]іць
SFX d оль лі [^л]оль
SFX d онь ні [^л]онь
SFX d оть ті [^л]оть
SFX d оць ці [^л]оць
SFX d ель лі [^л]ель
SFX d ень ні [^л]ень
SFX d еть ті [^л]еть
SFX d ець ці [^л]ець
SFX d іль лів [^л]іль
SFX d інь нів [^л]інь
SFX d іть тів [^л]іть
SFX d іць ців [^л]іць
SFX d оль лів [^л]оль
SFX d онь нів [^л]онь
SFX d оть тів [^л]оть
SFX d оць ців [^л]оць
SFX d ель лів [^л]ель
SFX d ень нів [^л]ень
SFX d еть тів [^л]еть
SFX d ець ців [^л]ець
SFX d іль лям [^л]іль
SFX d інь ням [^л]інь
SFX d іть тям [^л]іть
SFX d іць цям [^л]іць
SFX d оль лям [^л]оль
SFX d онь ням [^л]онь
SFX d оть тям [^л]оть
SFX d оць цям [^л]оць
SFX d ель лям [^л]ель
SFX d ень ням [^л]ень
SFX d еть тям [^л]еть
SFX d ець цям [^л]ець
SFX d іль лями [^л]іль
SFX d інь нями [^л]інь
SFX d іть тями [^л]іть
SFX d іць цями [^л]іць
SFX d оль лями [^л]оль
SFX d онь нями [^л]онь
SFX d оть тями [^л]оть
SFX d оць цями [^л]оць
SFX d ель лями [^л]ель
SFX d ень нями [^л]ень
SFX d еть тями [^л]еть
SFX d ець цями [^л]ець
SFX d іль лях [^л]іль
SFX d інь нях [^л]інь
SFX d іть тях [^л]іть
SFX d іць цях [^л]іць
SFX d оль лях [^л]оль
SFX d онь нях [^л]онь
SFX d оть тях [^л]оть
SFX d оць цях [^л]оць
SFX d ель лях [^л]ель
SFX d ень нях [^л]ень
SFX d еть тях [^л]еть
SFX d ець цях [^л]ець
SFX d ев ви ев
SFX d ек ки ек
SFX d ел ли ел
SFX d ем ми ем
SFX d ен ни ен
SFX d ер ри ер
SFX d ес си ес
SFX d ет ти ет
SFX d ов ви ов
SFX d ок ки ок
SFX d ол ли ол
SFX d ом ми ом
SFX d он ни он
SFX d ор ри ор
SFX d ос си ос
SFX d от ти от
SFX d ев вів ев
SFX d ек ків ек
SFX d ел лів ел
SFX d ем мів ем
SFX d ен нів ен
SFX d ер рів ер
SFX d ес сів ес
SFX d ет тів ет
SFX d ов вів ов
SFX d ок ків ок
SFX d ол лів ол
SFX d ом мів ом
SFX d он нів он
SFX d ор рів ор
SFX d ос сів ос
SFX d от тів от
SFX d ев вам ев
SFX d ек кам ек
SFX d ел лам ел
SFX d ем мам ем
SFX d ен нам ен
SFX d ер рам ер
SFX d ес сам ес
SFX d ет там ет
SFX d ов вам ов
SFX d ок кам ок
SFX d ол лам ол
SFX d ом мам ом
SFX d он нам он
SFX d ор рам ор
SFX d ос сам ос
SFX d от там от
SFX d ев вами ев
SFX d ек ками ек
SFX d ел лами ел
SFX d ем мами ем
SFX d ен нами ен
SFX d ер рами ер
SFX d ес сами ес
SFX d ет тами ет
SFX d ов вами ов
SFX d ок ками ок
SFX d ол лами ол
SFX d ом мами ом
SFX d он нами он
SFX d ор рами ор
SFX d ос сами ос
SFX d от тами от
SFX d ев вах ев
SFX d ек ках ек
SFX d ел лах ел
SFX d ем мах ем
SFX d ен нах ен
SFX d ер рах ер
SFX d ес сах ес
SFX d ет тах ет
SFX d ов вах ов
SFX d ок ках ок
SFX d ол лах ол
SFX d ом мах ом
SFX d он нах он
SFX d ор рах ор
SFX d ос сах ос
SFX d от тах от
SFX d ень ьні лень
SFX d ець ьці лець
SFX d ень ьнів лень
SFX d ець ьців лець
SFX d ень ьням лень
SFX d ець ьцям лець
SFX d ень ьнями лень
SFX d ець ьцями лець
SFX d ень ьнях лень
SFX d ець ьцях лець
SFX d єць йці єць
SFX d єць йців єць
SFX d єць йцям єць
SFX d єць йцями єць
SFX d єць йцях єць
SFX e Y 10
SFX e ий а ий
SFX e ий ої ий
SFX e ий ій ий
SFX e ий у ий
SFX e ий ою ий
SFX e ій я ій
SFX e ій ьої ій
SFX e ій ій ій
SFX e ій ю ій
SFX e ій ьою ій
SFX f Y 5
SFX f е і ще
SFX f е 0 ще
SFX f е ам ще
SFX f е ами ще
SFX f е ах ще
SFX g Y 17
SFX g ев ве ев
SFX g ел ле ел
SFX g ем ме ем
SFX g ен не ен
SFX g ер ре ер
SFX g ес се ес
SFX g ет те ет
SFX g ов ве ов
SFX g ол ле ол
SFX g ом ме ом
SFX g он не он
SFX g ор ре ор
SFX g ос се ос
SFX g от те от
SFX g ець че [^л]ець
SFX g ок че ок
SFX g ець ьче лець
SFX h Y 5
SFX h я є ['ьіІйеиаоу]я
SFX h а е [жчшщ]а
SFX h я е [дзлнцрст]я
SFX h а о [^жчшщ]а
SFX h А О ГА
SFX i Y 4
SFX i 0 0 р
SFX i ідь еде ідь
SFX i іль еле іль
SFX i інь ене інь
SFX j Y 123
SFX j їй його їй
SFX j їй йому їй
SFX j їй їм їй
SFX j їй я їй
SFX j їй йої їй
SFX j їй ю їй
SFX j їй йою їй
SFX j їй є їй
SFX j ій ього [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій ьому [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій ім [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій я [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій ьої [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій ю [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій ьою [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій є [^жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій ого [жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій ому [жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій ім [жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій а [жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій ої [жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій у [жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій ою [жкчшщ]ій
SFX j ій е [жкчшщ]ій
SFX j 'є його 'є
SFX j 'є йому 'є
SFX j є їм 'є
SFX j я ьої я
SFX j я ій я
SFX j я ю я
SFX j я ьою я
SFX j я і я
SFX j я ім я
SFX j я іх я
SFX j я іми я
SFX j а ої а
SFX j а ій а
SFX j а у а
SFX j а ою а
SFX j а і а
SFX j а им а
SFX j а их а
SFX j а ими а
SFX j й 0 [ії]й
SFX j й х [ії]й
SFX j й ми [ії]й
SFX j е ого е
SFX j е ому е
SFX j е им е
SFX j е ім е
SFX j є ього [^']є
SFX j є ьому [^']є
SFX j є ім [^']є
SFX j і их і
SFX j і им і
SFX j і ими і
SFX j ийсь огось ийсь
SFX j ийсь омусь ийсь
SFX j ийсь имсь ийсь
SFX j ийсь имось ийсь
SFX j ийсь імсь ийсь
SFX j ийсь ась ийсь
SFX j ийсь оїсь ийсь
SFX j ийсь ійсь ийсь
SFX j ийсь усь ийсь
SFX j ийсь оюсь ийсь
SFX j ийсь есь ийсь
SFX j ийсь ісь ийсь
SFX j ийсь ихсь ийсь
SFX j ийсь ихось ийсь
SFX j ийсь имись ийсь
SFX j 0 ого [іїи]н
SFX j 0 ому [іїи]н
SFX j 0 им [іїи]н
SFX j 0 ім [іїи]н
SFX j 0 а [іїи]н
SFX j 0 ої [іїи]н
SFX j 0 ій [іїи]н
SFX j 0 у [іїи]н
SFX j 0 ою [іїи]н
SFX j 0 е [іїи]н
SFX j 0 і [іїи]н
SFX j 0 их [іїи]н
SFX j 0 ими [іїи]н
SFX j ів ового [^жчшщ]ів
SFX j ів овому [^жчшщ]ів
SFX j ів овим [^жчшщ]ів
SFX j ів овім [^жчшщ]ів
SFX j ів ова [^жчшщ]ів
SFX j ів ової [^жчшщ]ів
SFX j ів овій [^жчшщ]ів
SFX j ів ову [^жчшщ]ів
SFX j ів овою [^жчшщ]ів
SFX j ів ове [^жчшщ]ів
SFX j ів ові [^жчшщ]ів
SFX j ів ових [^жчшщ]ів
SFX j ів овими [^жчшщ]ів
SFX j ий ого ий
SFX j ий ому ий
SFX j ий им ий
SFX j ий ім ий
SFX j ий а ий
SFX j ий ої ий
SFX j ий ій ий
SFX j ий у ий
SFX j ий ою ий
SFX j ий е ий
SFX j ий і ий
SFX j ий их ий
SFX j ий ими ий
SFX j їв євого їв
SFX j їв євому їв
SFX j їв євим їв
SFX j їв євім їв
SFX j їв єва їв
SFX j їв євої їв
SFX j їв євій їв
SFX j їв єву їв
SFX j їв євою їв
SFX j їв єве їв
SFX j їв єві їв
SFX j їв євих їв
SFX j їв євими їв
SFX k Y 1
SFX k а о [жчшщ]а
SFX l Y 2
SFX l ти то [^с]ти
SFX l сти то сти
SFX m Y 32
SFX m іч очей [мн]іч
SFX m іч очам [мн]іч
SFX m іч очами [мн]іч
SFX m іч очах [мн]іч
SFX m ь ей [^їі]сть
SFX m ь ям [^їі]сть
SFX m ь ями [^їі]сть
SFX m ь ях [^їі]сть
SFX m іш ошів іш
SFX m іш ошам іш
SFX m іш ошами іш
SFX m іш ошах іш
SFX m іль олей іль
SFX m іль олям іль
SFX m іль олями іль
SFX m іль олях іль
SFX m іч ечей [^нм]іч
SFX m іч ечам [^нм]іч
SFX m іч ечами [^нм]іч
SFX m іч ечах [^нм]іч
SFX m ість остей ість
SFX m ість остям ість
SFX m ість остями ість
SFX m ість остях ість
SFX m їсть йостей їсть
SFX m їсть йостям їсть
SFX m їсть йостями їсть
SFX m їсть йостях їсть
SFX m ідь одей ідь
SFX m ідь одям ідь
SFX m ідь одями ідь
SFX m ідь одях ідь
SFX n Y 20
SFX n а 0 а
SFX n и 0 и
SFX n а ам а
SFX n и ам и
SFX n а ами а
SFX n и ами и
SFX n а ах а
SFX n и ах и
SFX n і ь [лнцс]і
SFX n і ям [лнцс]і
SFX n і ями [лнцс]і
SFX n і ях [лнцс]і
SFX n ї й ї
SFX n ї ям ї
SFX n ї ями ї
SFX n ї ях ї
SFX n і 0 [^лнцс]і
SFX n і ам [^лнцс]і
SFX n і ами [^лнцс]і
SFX n і ах [^лнцс]і
