dictionaries/uk/index.dic
алеутка/%<h
алмаатинець/3`d
Альоша/%k
Андрюша/%k
анізакіди/n
антикоронавірусний/j
аражувальниця/%;h
Аркаша/%k
асинхронність/Am
афганець/3`d
Базилівка/%h
Баланини/n
балетоманський/j
безвольність/Am
безлюдність/Am
безсильність/Am
безталанний/j+Ee_
безталанниця/%;h
безумець/3`d
Білоблоцький/Ee_
Білогуби/n
біляпланетний/j
Біргітта/%h
бобер/3`dg
богобоязливість/Am
богомолець/3`dg
богоотець/3`g
боготворець/3`d
боривітер/3`dg
Бочковський/Ee_
Бошівка/%h
брандмайстер/3`dg
Бугор/3`g
будинок/3d
бурмистер/3`dg
бусел/3`dg
бушменка/%<h
Ванін/Cj
Васьківський/Ee_
вашинґтонець/3`d
ввімкнути/XNl
ввічливість/Am
вдмухнути/Xl
вебмайстер/3`dg
веб-майстер/3`dg
велярії/n
вепер/3`dg
вередуля/%;h
вибризнути/Xl
видерти/Xl
видозмінність/Am
викидок/3`d
викрикнути/Xl
винуватий/j+Ee_
виперти/Xl
випробуваний/j
витягнути/XNl
вишкварка/%<h
вівіпари/n
відділок/3`d
відігріти/Yl
відрядність/Am
відстебнути/Xl
відщепнути/Xl
військово-промисловий/j
віршописець/3`d
Вітер/3`g
вітер/3dg
Владлена/%;h
вмілець/3`dg
Воїнственський/Ee_
волокнистість/Am
Ворони/n
вскубнути/Xl
вугор/3`dg
вузьковживаний/j
габонець/3`d
Габрієла/%h
Галицький/Ee_
Гаркуша/%hk
гельмінтологиня/%;h
гетерополярність/Am
Глаша/%k
глевтячок/3`d
глобалізаційний/j
Головацький/Ee_
Гологори/n
Голокам'янка/%h
гонивітер/3`dg
горобець/3`dg
Гоша/%k
Гриневецький/Ee_
грифонівець/3`d
Гриша/%k
Гришинка/%h
груденята/n
Груша/%k
давність/Am
Даргомизький/Ee_
Даша/%k
двірницький/j
дезирадка/%<h
державознавець/3`d
Держгеонадра/n
дівуля/%;h
дігтівський/j
Дністер/3`g
Добровлянський/Ee_
доброзичливість/Am
доглянути/XlN
документознавець/3`d
Долиняни/n
доцільність/Am
Дроздовиця/%h
Дудзяний/Ee
дятел/3`dg
еколого-трофічний/j
екс-податківець/3`d
експосол/3`dg
екстрамайстер/3`dg
Елайджа/%k
електропослуги/n
Еліша/%k
Ельзара/%h
енергоємність/Am
європи/n
Єгипет/3g
єреванець/3`d
Жолкевський/Ee_
жорсткість/Am
Жужа/%k
забіглий/j
забрити/Yl
Задворний/Ee_
задніпровець/3`d
Задністряни/n
закам'янілість/Am
заколоти/XNl
Залижня/%h
зарисовуваний/j
Заріцький/Ee_
зарозумілець/3`d
затерти/Xl
зачерствілість/Am
збути/Xl
зводини/n
Земляний/Ee_
зенітівець/3`d
зімкнути/XNl
злободенність/Am
змінений/j
зшити/Yl
Ізбашівка/%h
іллірієць/3`d
Іллюша/%k
інакомовність/Am
інвествимоги/n
історико-технічний/j
Казановський/Ee_
кайманець/3d`
капвитрати/n
каракалпачка/%<h
Карпуша/%k
Кваша/%k
Керницький/Ee_
керованість/Am
Кеша/%k
кийочок/3`d
Кирюша/%k
кіномайстер/3`dg
кіосковий/j
книговидавець/3`d
кодифікаторка/%<h
Козачани/n
Кокоша/%k
Комаровський/Ee_
конституційність/Am
коропець/3`d
Корости/n
котловинський/j
Коцюбинський/Ee_
кравець/3`dg
Красноярка/%h
Кривуші/n
Кроковський/Ee_
Ксюша/%k
Кшишовський/Ee
лаконічність/Am
легковага/%;h
лемуралії/n
лєнінець/3`d
Ливицький/Ee
лівопередсердний/j
Ліщини/n
ловець/3`dg
Лопушинський/Ee
людоїдка/%<h
Льоша/%k
Мазовецький/Ee_
майстер/3`dg
Макухи/n
малість/Am
Малуша/%;k
марнословець/3`d
Марша/%k
масштабований/j
Маша/%;k
Маяцький/Ee_
медіаторка/%<h
Милуша/%;k
мікрокількість/Am
Міша/%k
Могиляни/n
Мойша/%k
Мокшицький/Ee_
монопольніший/j
моток/3`d
Мочулка/%h
нагнути/Xl
надвтрати/n
найвідвідуваніший/j
найнезбагненніше/j
найтоталітарніший/j
накинути/XNl
народність/Am
Наташа/%;k
натягнути/XNl
науково-художній/j
невдоволений/j+Ee_
недодуманість/Am
недомірок/3`d
незмістовний/j
неконкретність/Am
неповторність/Am
нерозбещений/j
нерухливість/Am
нетяга/%;h
нечестивий/j+Ee_
Ниговищі/n
ніч/Am
обгорнути/XNl
обділений/j
обермайстер/3`dg
обранець/3`d
обтерти/Xl
одтяти/Xl
озеленювачка/%<h
Окіпний/Ee_
Олеша/%kh
опалини/n
опасистий/j
описовість/Am
орел/3`dg
осел/3`dg
Остер/3`g
П'ятницький/Ee_
Павлуша/%k
Пазинаки/n
панотець/3`dg
Папуша/%k
паразитка/%<h
парусиновий/j
Паша/%k
перегріти/Yl
перенагріти/Yl
перетяти/Xl
першокурсний/j
пес/3`dg
Петруша/%k
Пильгани/n
Писаревський/Ee_
північноафриканець/3`d
підітнути/Xl
підозріливість/Am
підшефний/jEe_
підшити/Yl
пінгвіниха/%;h
пожилець/3`d
політамбіції/n
Політковський/Ee_
поліхоричний/j
полляти/Xl
половинчатість/Am
попсуй-майстер/3`dg
пострижини/n
пошити/Yl
праля/%;h
праотець/3`dg
привідець/3`d
прилюдність/Am
прип'яти/Xl
прищикнути/Xl
проволочений/j
пропороти/XNl
протоболгари/n
псевдодобуток/3d
Путицький/Ee
радіомайстер/3`dg
райдужність/Am
революціонерка/%<h
Риби/n
Родіонів/j
розвернути/XlN
розітнути/XlN
розсудливість/Am
розчахнути/XNl
романець/3`d
рум'яна/n
Саворовський/Ee_
Савранка/%h
Саша/%kh
Сербичани/n
Серьожа/%k
Синиха/%h
Синиша/%k
Синіша/%k
синок/3`d
сінефільський/j
Сірожа/%k
скромність/Am
сліпий/j+Ee_
сороковини/n
спецбоївка/%<h
співв'язень/3`d
спом'янути/Xl
Ставищани/n
старець/3`dg
стихійність/Am
Сусанна/%;h
Сухий/Ee_
сухожильний/j
Сущани/n
сюртучок/3`d
телемайстер/3`dg
Терези/n
тіосіль/Am
трамвайниця/%;h
тріснути/Xl
трудовитрати/n
труночок/3d
укапнути/Xl
умілець/3`dg
уповноважений/jEe_
уподобаний/j
ушити/Yl
фальшивість/Am
фекалії/n
Фіалка/%h
фрігієць/3`d
хлопець/3`dg
Цапівка/%h
цехмайстер/3`dg
ченець/3`dg
Червища/n
Черкаський/Ee_
чигиринець/3`d
шабалинівський/j
шаленість/Am
швагер/3`dg
Шепіївка/%h
Щирський/Ee_
щонайнетактовніше/j
щоякнайзлоякісніший/j
якнайбоязливіший/j
якнайстильніший/j
ясенок/3`d
Яша/%k
